Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,100
Reverter or rights of entry; termination of trust; succession.

At the termination of a trust, however effected, any right of entry or reentry for breach of condition subsequent and any possibility of reverter heretofore or hereafter reserved by or to the trustee and affecting land in this state ceases and determines as to the trustee, but shall, at such termination pass to the person or persons who receive the assets of the trust.

Laws 1959, c. 350, § 2, p. 1237.

This section does not purport to create a new estate nor to expand the existing law on the subject. Cast v. National Bank of Commerce T. & S. Assn., 186 Neb. 385, 183 N.W.2d 485 (1971).